Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 3
MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVER’S LICENSES

Sec.

§ 49-301. Drivers to be licensed.

No person, except those expressly exempted by the provisions of this chapter, shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway unless the person has a current and valid Idaho driver’s license. Provided however, that those persons holding a restricted school attendance driving permit may drive upon a highway pursuant to the restrictions set forth in section 49-307A, Idaho Code.

No person shall operate a motorcycle upon a highway unless he has a motorcycle endorsement on his valid driver’s license. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to persons operating autocycles.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle in violation of any valid restriction identified on, or attached to, his valid driver’s license.

No person shall receive a class D driver’s license unless and until he surrenders to the department all driver’s licenses in his possession issued to him by Idaho or any other jurisdiction for use within the United States, or any identification cards issued by any other jurisdiction within the United States, or until he executes an affidavit that he does not possess a driver’s license or any identification cards.

No person shall be permitted to have more than one (1) driver’s license issued for use within the United States at any time.

No person shall operate a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code, upon a highway:

Without obtaining a commercial driver’s license.

Without having the appropriate class A, B or C commercial driver’s license in the operator’s possession.

Without the proper license class of commercial driver’s license or endorsements for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported.

Unless the operator has a seasonal or class A, B or C driver’s license with required endorsements in his possession.

Without having a current and valid medical examiner’s certificate on file with the department while operating in a “non-excepted” status as required by the federal motor carrier safety administration. Medical examiner’s certificates submitted for filing must be legible and shall be submitted in a manner acceptable to the department. If the federal motor carrier safety administration has issued a medical exemption letter or skill performance evaluation certificate, the driver must have the current and valid documentation in physical possession and available upon request to a duly authorized federal, state or local enforcement official.

Any holder of a class A, B or C commercial driver’s license issued by a jurisdiction other than Idaho shall apply for an Idaho-issued commercial driver’s license within thirty (30) days of establishing a domicile in Idaho. In accordance with the federal motor carrier safety regulations, no person shall receive a class A, B or C driver’s license unless and until he surrenders to the department all driver’s licenses in his possession issued to him by Idaho or any other jurisdiction.

§ 49-302. What persons are exempt from license.

The following persons are exempt from licensing if driving privileges are not suspended, canceled, revoked, disqualified, denied or refused:

Any person while driving or operating any farm tractor or implement of husbandry when incidentally operated on a highway.

Farmers are exempt from obtaining a class A, B or C driver’s license to operate a commercial motor vehicle which is:

Controlled and operated by a farmer, including operation by employees or family members; and

Used to transport either agricultural products, farm machinery, farm supplies, or both, to or from a farm; and

Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and

Used within one hundred fifty (150) miles of the person’s farm.

Any person is exempt from obtaining a class A, B or C driver’s license for the operation of commercial motor vehicles which are necessary to the preservation of life or property or the execution of emergency governmental functions, are equipped with audible and visual signals, and are not subject to normal traffic regulations.

Any person is exempt from obtaining a class A, B or C license to operate a commercial vehicle which is exclusively used to transport personal possessions or family members for nonbusiness or recreational purposes.

A nonresident who is at least fifteen (15) years of age and who has in his immediate possession a valid driver’s license issued to him in his home state or country may operate a motor vehicle in Idaho only as a class D operator with driving privileges restricted to daylight hours only except as provided in section 49-307(9), Idaho Code, and with full privileges at sixteen (16) years of age, and only if Idaho residency is not established.

A nonresident who is at least fifteen (15) years of age and who has in his possession a valid driver’s license with a motorcycle endorsement or who has a valid motorcycle driver’s license issued to him in his home state or country may operate a motorcycle in Idaho with driving privileges restricted to daylight hours only, and with full privileges at sixteen (16) years of age.

A nonresident who has in his immediate possession a valid commercial driver’s license issued to him in his home state or country may operate a motor vehicle in Idaho.

A nonresident on active duty in the armed forces of the United States who has a valid driver’s license issued by his home jurisdiction, and such nonresident’s spouse or dependent son or daughter who has a valid driver’s license issued by such person’s home jurisdiction.

Any active duty military personnel, active duty U.S. coast guard personnel, and members of the reserves and national guard on active duty including personnel on full-time national guard duty, personnel on part-time training and national guard military technicians who as civilians are required to wear military uniforms and are subject to the code of military justice, are exempt from obtaining a commercial driver’s license to operate military vehicles. This exemption does not apply to U.S. reserve technicians.

Any person with a valid driver’s license issued in their name is exempt from the requirement to obtain a motorcycle endorsement on the license when operating a motorcycle on highways or sections of highways designated for unregistered motorcycle use under section 49-426(3), Idaho Code.
(11) Any person under the age of sixteen (16) years when operating an ATV, UTV, specialty off-highway vehicle or motorbike on roads on federal or state land where the road is not part of the highway system of the state of Idaho or local road management authority and is supervised by a licensed adult operator eighteen (18) years of age or older, and the road is open for such use, subject to the following:

Any unlicensed operators under the age of sixteen (16) years, on national forest roads must have completed a motorbike or ATV safety course approved by the Idaho department of parks and recreation, and a certificate or other proof of completion of such safety course shall be in the possession of the unlicensed operator of any ATV, UTV, specialty off-highway vehicle or motorbike, or shall be present in the vehicle at all times when the vehicle is operated on national forest roads. The certificate or proof of completion shall be provided for inspection to any peace officer upon request. No person shall be convicted of violating the provisions of this subsection if that person produces, at any time prior to conviction, the certificate or proof of completion of the approved safety course where the certificate shows completion of the course prior to the violation. In the event of a violation of the provisions of this subsection, the supervising adult may be charged with an infraction.

For purposes of this subsection, “supervised” means that the supervising adult must be in a position, on another ATV, UTV, specialty off-highway vehicle or motorbike, or if on the ground, within three hundred (300) feet of the unlicensed operator, to provide close support, assistance or direction to the unlicensed operator.

§ 49-303. What persons shall not be licensed.

The department shall not issue any driver’s license, any instruction permit, privileges or right to drive and if issued, may revoke or cancel the driver’s license of a person who:

As an operator of a vehicle requiring a class D driver’s license, is under the age of seventeen (17) years, except that the department may issue a driver’s license to any person who has successfully completed an approved driver’s training course, has completed the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit, and who is at least fifteen (15) years of age, with driving privileges restricted to daylight hours only except as provided in section 49-307(9), Idaho Code, and with full privileges at sixteen (16) years of age. The restriction of daylight hours only shall mean that period of time one-half (½) hour before sunrise to one-half (½) hour after sunset. If a person who is at least fifteen (15) years but is under seventeen (17) years of age has successfully completed an approved driver’s training course and has been issued a driver’s license in another state, he may be issued a class D driver’s license in this state. Provided however, that a restricted school attendance driving permit may be issued to those persons meeting the criteria set forth in section 49-307A, Idaho Code.

As an operator of a vehicle requiring a class D driver’s license, is under the age of seventeen (17) years and has not successfully completed an approved driver’s training course and has not satisfied the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit. Provided however, that a restricted school attendance driving permit may be issued to those persons meeting the criteria set forth in section 49-307A, Idaho Code.

As an operator of a commercial vehicle requiring a class A, B or C driver’s license is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

Applicants with less than one (1) year of driving experience, as evidenced by a previous driver’s license shall not be issued a class A, B or C driver’s license or a class A, B or C instruction permit.

As a driver has had his license, class D instruction permit, restricted school attendance driving permit, privileges or right to drive suspended for the duration of the suspension, nor to any person who has had his class D driver’s training instruction permit or class D supervised instruction permit canceled for the duration of the cancellation, nor to any person whose license has been revoked, suspended, canceled or disqualified by this state or any other jurisdiction; provided however, where a driver’s license has been revoked, suspended, canceled or disqualified in any other jurisdiction, and the driver has completed the period of revocation, suspension, cancellation or disqualification as specified by the jurisdiction, that person may be granted a class D driver’s license in this state if five (5) years have elapsed from the time of eligibility for reinstatement in the other jurisdiction, even though the driver has not fulfilled the requirements for reinstatement in the other jurisdiction.

Has been adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be an habitual drunkard or addicted to the use of narcotic drugs, and such order has been received by the department.

Has been adjudged by a licensed physician or by a court of competent jurisdiction to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental incompetence that would affect the person’s ability to safely operate a motor vehicle and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency by the methods provided by law, and such order has been received by the department.

Is required by the provisions of this chapter to take an examination, unless that person shall have successfully passed such examination.

May be required under any law of this state to furnish proof of financial responsibility and who has not furnished that proof.

The department has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by that person would be harmful to public safety or welfare.

Is disqualified for a class A, B or C driver’s license, except he may be issued a class D driver’s license.

Is under eighteen (18) years of age and is not enrolled in school, has not received a waiver pursuant to or has not satisfactorily completed school as provided in section 49-303A, Idaho Code.

Is not a resident of the state of Idaho.

Is not lawfully present in the United States.

§ 49-303A. Driver’s license or permits issued to certain persons under the age of eighteen years.

Attendance requirements. The department may issue a driver’s license, a class D driver’s training instruction permit, a class D supervised instruction permit, or a class D instruction permit to a minor younger than eighteen (18) years of age if, at the time of application, the minor:

Has received a high school diploma, a high school equivalency diploma, a special diploma or a certificate of high school completion;

Is enrolled in a public or private school and satisfies relevant attendance requirements;

Is enrolled in a study course in preparation for a test of general educational development and satisfies relevant attendance requirements;

Is enrolled in a home education program and satisfies the requirements of rules of the state board of education and the state department of education for such programs; provided that students shall be in compliance with the requirements and have been enrolled in the home education program for at least one (1) school year prior to verification of the attendance request, unless documentation of meeting the requirements of this section in the school year contiguous to enrollment in the home education program can be provided;

Is enrolled in an accredited college or university;

Is enrolled in a postsecondary vocational program or a postsecondary adult vocational program and satisfying relevant attendance requirements;

Is enrolled in a job training program pursuant to state or federal law and satisfying relevant attendance requirements; or

Is enrolled in other educational activities approved by the board of trustees of the school district and satisfying relevant attendance requirements.

An applicant for a driver’s license who is under the age of eighteen (18) shall provide written verification of compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or receipt of a waiver therefrom pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to the department. The necessary verification shall be obtained from the school district. If the applicant is enrolled in or has graduated from a private high school, the verification shall be obtained by the applicant from the governing body of the private school. A school district shall not refuse to provide written verification of compliance with the requirements of this section to the department.
(2)(a) An applicant for a driver’s license who is under the age of eighteen (18) shall provide written verification of compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or receipt of a waiver therefrom pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to the department. The necessary verification shall be obtained from the school district. If the applicant is enrolled in or has graduated from a private high school, the verification shall be obtained by the applicant from the governing body of the private school. A school district shall not refuse to provide written verification of compliance with the requirements of this section to the department.

Schools may implement interventions designed to improve student attendance with their district policies and procedures.

When applying for a license or any instruction permit, an applicant under age eighteen (18) must provide written verification to the department of compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or receipt of a waiver therefrom, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Written verification shall be obtained from the applicant’s school. The applicant’s school shall not refuse to provide written verification of compliance with the requirements of this section to the department.

A public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school shall provide written notification to a minor and the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian of the school district’s or private school’s intent to request that the department suspend the minor’s driving privileges because the minor has dropped out of school and has failed to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The minor or the parent, guardian or custodian of the minor shall have fifteen (15) calendar days from the date of receipt of this notice to request a hearing before the public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school for the purpose of reviewing the pending suspension. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty (30) calendar days after the public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school receives the request.
(3)(a) A public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school shall provide written notification to a minor and the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian of the school district’s or private school’s intent to request that the department suspend the minor’s driving privileges because the minor has dropped out of school and has failed to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The minor or the parent, guardian or custodian of the minor shall have fifteen (15) calendar days from the date of receipt of this notice to request a hearing before the public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school for the purpose of reviewing the pending suspension. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty (30) calendar days after the public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school receives the request.

Any person denied a hardship waiver by a public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school may appeal the decision to the board of trustees of the school district or the governing body of the private school. The public or private school shall notify the department of all students not in compliance with subsection (1) of this section or who have been granted a hardship waiver pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Upon receiving written verification that the reinstatement fees have been paid and the minor is again in compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall reinstate the minor’s privilege to drive. Thereafter, if the school district determines that the minor is not in compliance with the requirements of subsection (1), the department shall suspend the minor’s driving privilege until the minor is eighteen (18) years old or otherwise satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, whichever occurs first.

The department shall report quarterly to each school district the disposition of all requests to suspend driver’s licenses of students of that district. Beginning with the 1996-97 school year, each school district and each private school shall report the number of notifications issued of possible student driver’s license suspensions based on nonattendance, requests to the department to suspend a driver’s license and student driver’s licenses actually suspended.

(c) The public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school shall waive the requirements of subsection (1) of this section for any minor under its jurisdiction for whom a personal or family hardship requires that the minor have a driver’s license for his or her own or his or her family’s employment or medical care. The public school principal, or the principal’s designee, or the designee of the governing body of a private school shall take into account the recommendations of teachers, other school officials, guidance counselors or academic advisors prior to granting a waiver to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

(d) The hardship waiver provided in paragraph (c) of this section shall be requested, if desired by the minor or the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian at the initial hearing.

§ 49-304. Motorcycle endorsement.

The department shall issue a motorcycle “M” endorsement on a driver’s license to applicants who complete the requirements to operate a motorcycle.

No person may operate a motorcycle upon a highway without a motorcycle “M” endorsement on a valid driver’s license.

Any person who applies for a driver’s license or renewal of a license may also apply for a motorcycle “M” endorsement. The requirements for obtaining a motorcycle “M” endorsement are:

The applicant shall be tested by written examination for his knowledge of safe motorcycle operating practices and traffic laws specific to the operation of motorcycles upon payment of the fee specified in section 49-306, Idaho Code.

Upon successful completion of the knowledge test and upon payment of the fee required for an “M” endorsement, the applicant shall obtain a motorcycle “M” endorsement on his driver’s license.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) years may apply for or obtain a motorcycle “M” endorsement on his driver’s license unless he has successfully completed a motorcycle rider training course approved under the provisions of chapter 49, title 33, Idaho Code, in addition to satisfying the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not be effective unless and until the motorcycle rider training course is fully implemented by the division of career technical education.

Any person who applies for a motorcycle endorsement on a driver’s license, in addition to the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section, may also be required to pass the motorcycle “M” skills test before he can obtain the motorcycle “M” endorsement.

The operation of a motorcycle upon a highway by any person who has failed to obtain a motorcycle “M” endorsement as provided in this section shall constitute an infraction.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons operating autocycles.

§ 49-305. Instruction permits — Commercial learner’s permit — Temporary licenses — Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit.

Upon passage of the required knowledge tests appropriate for the vehicle being operated, the department may issue a commercial learner’s permit for the type of vehicle(s) the person will be operating, or a class D instruction permit for a class D motor vehicle, entitling the applicant, while having the permit in his immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle upon the highways for a period of up to one hundred eighty (180) days or as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) for certain class D instruction permits. That person must be accompanied by an adult driver eighteen (18) years of age or older who holds a valid driver’s license appropriate for the vehicle being operated and who is actually occupying a seat beside the driver. Unless otherwise provided, a commercial learner’s permit or class D instruction permit will be valid for one hundred eighty (180) days and may be renewed one (1) time without requiring the permit holder to retake and pass the required knowledge tests for that class of permit, provided the knowledge tests are less than one (1) year old.

Any person under the age of seventeen (17) years who has successfully completed an approved driver’s training course and has satisfied the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit, or any person who has reached the age of seventeen (17) years may apply for a class D instruction permit. Any person applying for any class D instruction permit or driving privileges who is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be in compliance with school attendance requirements of section 49-303A, Idaho Code.

If a person reaches the age of seventeen (17) years while operating a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit, and such class D supervised instruction permit becomes a class D instruction permit as provided in section 49-307, Idaho Code, then such class D instruction permit shall expire five (5) days after the permittee’s eighteenth birthday.

Any person who has reached the age of eighteen (18) years, holds a valid Idaho class D driver’s license and has at least one (1) year of driving experience, may apply for a commercial learner’s permit.

The department shall not issue a hazardous material endorsement on any commercial learner’s permit.

The department may, at its discretion, issue a temporary class D driver’s license to an applicant for a class D driver’s license permitting him to operate a motor vehicle while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant’s right to receive a driver’s license. The temporary license may be canceled at the department’s discretion at any time after issuance. The temporary license must be in the applicant’s immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle, and it shall be invalid when the applicant’s driver’s license has been issued or for good cause has been refused.

A certified copy of an applicant’s birth certificate shall be required before a class D driver’s license or class D instruction permit will be issued.

The department may issue a motorcycle endorsement instruction permit to an applicant who has a valid driver’s license and who has successfully completed the motorcycle rider’s knowledge test and paid the appropriate fees. The permit entitles the applicant, while having the permit in his immediate possession, to operate a motorcycle upon the highways for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. The motorcycle endorsement instruction permit may be renewed one (1) time without the requirement to retake and pass the motorcycle rider’s knowledge test if the test is less than one (1) year old. If the permittee passes the skills test for a motorcycle endorsement within one hundred eighty (180) days of issuance of the motorcycle endorsement instruction permit, he shall not be required to pay the motorcycle endorsement fee. A person holding a motorcycle instruction permit shall not carry any passenger while operating a motorcycle, shall not operate a motorcycle except during the hours of daylight only and shall not operate a motorcycle upon any interstate highway system.
A violation of the conditions of a motorcycle endorsement instruction permit is an infraction. The department shall cancel the permit whether or not such violation results in conviction of the infraction.